Hawaii statutes.
[§321‑13.5
Certified nurse aides; investigations of abuse and neglect.] The
department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 relating to:

(1) The investigation of:

(A) Abuse or neglect by a certified nurse
aide working in a health care setting licensed or certified by the department;
and

(B) Misappropriation of an individual's
property by a certified nurse aide working in a health care setting licensed or
certified by the department; and

(2) Action taken against a certified nurse aide as a
result of an investigation pursuant to paragraph (1). [L 2007, c 226, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next